Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Penalties

56.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

56.250

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person who commits a moving traffic violation of any regulation of the Finance and Administration Cabinet governing the operation and use of motor vehicles on the grounds of a state-owned building, shall upon conviction be fined not less than two dollars ($2) nor more than fifteen dollars ($15); provided, however, that if such person is found guilty of violating any provision of such regulation for which the mandatory or discretionary revocation of drivers’ licenses is prescribed by KRS

186.560

and KRS

186.570

, then the penalty for such violation shall be the same as that prescribed by the law applicable to such offense.

Any individual who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

56.8181

shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both.

Any firm, corporation, or association which willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

56.8181

shall be fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). The assessment of a fine under this paragraph shall not prevent the punishment of an individual under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Any individual, including any employee or official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, who willfully violates a provision of KRS

56.800

to

56.823

, other than one found in KRS

56.8181

, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any employee or official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky who shall willfully take, receive, or offer to take or receive, either directly or indirectly, anything of value, as an inducement, or intended inducement, in the awarding of a state lease pursuant to KRS

56.800

to

56.823

, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, or both.

Any individual willfully offering to make, pay, or give, either directly or indirectly, anything of value, as an inducement, or intended inducement, in the awarding of a lease pursuant to KRS

56.800

to

56.823

, to any employee or official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, or both.

Any firm, corporation, or association willfully offering to make, pay, or give, either directly or indirectly, anything of value, as an inducement, or intended inducement, in the awarding of a lease, to any employee or official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). The assessment of a fine under this paragraph shall not prevent the punishment of an individual under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Any person who is convicted of or enters a guilty plea for a crime established in subsections (3) to (6) of this section shall be subject to the penalty established in paragraph (b) of this subsection in addition to the penalties established in those subsections.

For a period of five (5) years from the date of a person’s conviction or the entering of a person’s guilty plea, the Commonwealth shall not rent real property from a firm that employs the person or in which the person has any ownership interest.

History.

4705a: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 166, § 2; 1992, ch. 54, § 14, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 539, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.